pt-BR: Tipo de documento: Folheto; Cartão de visita; Certificado; Carta de apresentação; Folheto; Fatura; Documento legal; Newsletter; Apresentação em Powerpoint; Relatório; Retomar; Convite de casamento; Outro
fr: Type de modèle: Brochure; Carte de visite; Certificat; Lettre de motivation; Prospectus; Facture; Document légal; Newsletter; Présentation Powerpoint; Rapport; CV; Invitation de mariage; Autre
hu: Sablon típusa: Brosúra; Névjegykártya; Bizonyítvány; Kísérőlevél; Szórólap; Számla; Jogi dokumentum; Hírlevél; Powerpoint bemutató; Jelentés; Önéletrajz; Esküvői meghívó; Egyéb
el: Τύπος προτύπου: Φυλλάδιο; Επαγγελματικές κάρτες; Πιστοποιητικό; Συνοδευτική επιστολή; Αεροπόρος; Τιμολόγιο; Νομικό έγγραφο; Εγκύκλιος; Παρουσίαση Powerpoint; Εκθεση; Περίληψη; Προσκλητήριο γάμου; Άλλο
hr-HR: Vrsta predloška: Brošura; Posjetnica; Potvrda; Popratno pismo; Letak; Faktura; Pravni dokument; E-letak; Powerpoint prezentacija; Izvješće; Životopis; Pozivnica za vjenčanje; Ostalo
nb: Maltype: Brosjyre; Visittkort; Sertifikat; Følgebrev; Flyer; Faktura; Juridisk dokument; Nyhetsbrev; Powerpoint-presentasjon; Rapport; CV; Bryllupsinvitasjon; Annen
tr: Şablon Türü: Broşür; Kartvizit; Sertifika; Ön yazı; El ilanı; Fatura; Yasal belge; Bülten; Powerpoint sunumu; Rapor; Öz geçmiş; Düğün davetiyesi; Diğer
ro-RO: Tip șablon: Broșură; Carte de vizită; Certificat; Scrisoare de intenție; Pliant; Factură; Document juridic; Buletin informativ; Prezentare powerpoint; Raport; CV; Invitație de nuntă; Altele
cs: Typ šablony: Brožura; Vizitka; Osvědčení; Průvodní dopis; Leták; Faktura; Právní dokument; Zpravodaj; Powerpointová prezentace; Zpráva; Životopis; Svatební pozvánka; Jiné
es: Tipo de plantilla: Folleto; Tarjetas de visita; Certificado; Carta de presentación; Volantes; Factura; Documento legal; Boletin informativo; Presentación de Powerpoint; Informe; Currículum vitae; Invitación a boda; Otros
ko: 템플릿 유형: 소책자; 명함; 자격증; 자기 소개서; 전단; 인보이스; 법적 서류; 뉴스레터; 파워포인트 프레젠테이션; 보고서; 이력서; 청첩장; 기타
zh-CN: 模板类型: 宣传册; 名片; 证书; 求职信; 传单; 发票; 法律文件; 新闻通讯; PowerPoint 演示文稿; 报告; 简历; 婚礼请柬; 其他
lt-LT: Ruošinio tipas: Brošiūra; Vizitinė kortelė; Sertifikatas; Motyvacinis laiškas; Skrajutė; Sąskaita faktūra; Teisinis dokumentas; Naujienlaiškis; „Powerpoint“ pristatymas; Ataskaita; Santrauka; Kvietimas į vestuves; Kita
da: Skabelontype: Brochure; Visitkort; Certifikat; Følgebrev; Flyer; Faktura; Juridisk dokument; Nyhedsbrev; Powerpoint-præsentation; Rapport; CV; Bryllupsinvitation; Andet
de: Vorlagentyp: Broschüre; Visitenkarte; Zertifikat; Anschreiben; Flyer; Rechnung; Rechtsdokument; Newsletter; PowerPoint Präsentation; Bericht; Lebenslauf; Hochzeitseinladung; Sonstiges
vi: Loại mẫu: Tập sách nhỏ; Danh thiếp; Giấy chứng nhận; Thư xin việc; Tờ rơi; Hóa đơn; Văn bản pháp luật; Bản tin; Bản trình chiếu Powerpoint; Báo cáo; Sơ yếu lý lịch; Thiệp cưới; Khác
fi: Sivupohjatyyppi: Esite; Käyntikortit; Todistus; Saatekirje; Flyeri; Lasku; Laillinen dokumentti; Uutiskirje; Powerpoint-esitelmä; Raportti; CV; Hääkutsu; Muu
sl-SI: Vrsta predloge: Brošura; Poslovna vizitka; Certifikat; Spremno pismo; Letak; Račun; Pravni dokument; Glasilo; Powerpoint predstavitev; Poročilo; Življenjepis; Poročno vabilo; Drugo
pt-PT: Tipo de modelo: Brochura; Cartão de visita; Certificado; Carta de apresentação; Folheto; Fatura; Documento legal; Newsletter; Apresentação PowerPoint; Relatório; Currículo; Convite de casamento; Outro
pl: Typ szablonu: Broszura; Wizytówka; Zaświadczenie; Pismo przewodnie; Ulotka; Faktura; Dokument prawny; Biuletyn; Prezentacja PowerPoint; Raport; Resumé; Zaproszenie ślubne; Pozostałe
ja: テンプレートの種類: パンフレット; 名刺; 証明書; カバーレター; チラシ; 請求書; 法文書; ニュースレター; パワーポイントのプレゼンテーション資料; 報告書; 履歴書; 結婚式招待状; その他
ru: Тип шаблона: Брошюра; Визитная карточка; Сертификат; Сопроводительное письмо; Листовка; Счет; Юридический документ; Информационный бюллетень; Презентация в PowerPoint; Отчет; Резюме; Приглашение на свадьбу; Другой
sk-SK: Typ šablóny: Brožúra; Vizitka; Certifikát; Sprievodný list; Leták; Faktúra; Právny dokument; Newsletter; Powerpointová prezentácia; Správa; Životopis; Pozvánka na svadbu; Iné
en: Template type: Brochure; Business card; Certificate; Cover letter; Flyer; Invoice; Legal document; Newsletter; Powerpoint presentation; Report; Resume; Wedding invitation; Other
bg-BG: Тип шаблон: Брошура; Визитна картичка; Сертификат; Мотивационно писмо; Флаер; Фактура; Правен документ; Бюлетин; Powerpoint презентация; Доклад; Резюме; Покана за сватба; Други
th: ประเภทเทมเพลต: โบรชัวร์; นามบัตร; ใบรับรอง; จดหมายปะหน้า; ใบปลิว; ใบแจ้งหนี้; เอกสารทางกฎหมาย; จดหมายข่าว; การนำเสนอพาวเวอร์พอยท์; รายงาน; เรซูเม่; บัตรเชิญงานแต่ง; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 範本類型: 小冊子; 商務卡; 證書; 求職信; 傳單; 發票; 法律文件; 電子報; PowerPoint 簡報; 報告; 覆歷表; 婚禮邀請函; 其他
sv: Malltyp: Broschyr; Visitkort; Certifikat; Personligt brev; Flygblad; Faktura; Juridiskt dokument; Nyhetsbrev; Powerpoint-presentation; Rapport; Resumé; Bröllopsinbjudan; Annat
nl: Templatetype: Brochure; Visitekaartje; Certificaat; Voorblad; Folder; Factuur; Juridisch document; Nieuwsbrief; PowerPoint-presentatie; Rapport; Cv; Huwelijksuitnodiging; Andere
it: Tipo di modello: Opuscolo; Biglietto da visita; Certificato; Lettera di presentazione; Volantino; Fattura; Documento legale; Newsletter; Presentazione Powerpoint; Rapporto; Curriculum vitae; Invito a nozze; Altro